test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-I-ciman_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - cîmân - ok : # -m inanimate noun, canoe AEW NI1
     cîmân+N+I+Sg: cîmân
     cîmân+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg: nicîmân
     cîmân+N+I+Px2Sg+Sg: kicîmân
     cîmân+N+I+Px1Pl+Sg: nicîmâninân
     cîmân+N+I+Px12Pl+Sg: kicîmâninaw
     cîmân+N+I+Px2Pl+Sg: kicîmâniwâw
     cîmân+N+I+Px3Sg+Sg: ocîmân
     cîmân+N+I+Px3Pl+Sg: ocîmâniwâw
     cîmân+N+I+Px4Pl+Sg: ocîmâniyiw
              
     cîmân+N+I: cîmâna
     cîmân+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl: nicîmâna
     cîmân+N+I+Px2Sg+Pl: kicîmâna
     cîmân+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl: nicîmâninâna
     cîmân+N+I+Px12Pl+Pl: kicîmâninawa
     cîmân+N+I+Px2Pl+Pl: kicîmâniwâwa
     cîmân+N+I+Px3Sg+Pl: ocîmâna
     cîmân+N+I+Px3Pl+Pl: ocîmâniwâwa
     cîmân+N+I+Px4Pl+Pl: ocîmâniyiwa
              
     cîmân+N+I+Loc: cîmânihk
     cîmân+N+I+1Sg+Loc: nicîmânihk
     cîmân+N+I+2Sg+Loc: kicîmânihk
     cîmân+N+I+1Pl+Loc: nicîmâninâhk
     cîmân+N+I+12Pl+Loc: kicîmâninâhk
     cîmân+N+I+2Pl+Loc: kicîmâniwâhk
     cîmân+N+I+3Sg+Loc: ocîmânihk
     cîmân+N+I+3Pl+Loc: ocîmâniwâhk
     cîmân+N+I+4Pl+Loc: ocîmâniyihk
              
     cîmân+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Sg: [cîmânis, cîmânisis]
     cîmân+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Pl: [cîmânisa, cîmânisisa]
     cîmân+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Loc+Sg: [cîmânisihk, cîmânisisihk]
     cîmân+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg: [nicîmânis, nicîmânisis]
     cîmân+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl: [nicîmânisa, nicîmânisisa]
     cîmân+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Sg+Loc: [nicîmânisihk, nicîmânisisihk]
